Massachusetts, session 194th, H3219.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 57 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The assessors shall send a copy of bills for real estate taxes directly to the address for
which real estate taxes have been assessed and to the person appearing of record, if that person’s
address differs from the address for which the real estate taxes have been assessed.
of 1